Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.340

Infraction—Monetary penalty.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, a contractor found to have committed an infraction under RCW 18.27.200 shall be assessed a monetary penalty of not less than $200 and not more than $10,000.

(2) The director may waive collection in favor of payment of restitution to a consumer complainant.

(3) A contractor found to have committed an infraction under RCW 18.27.200 for failure to register shall be assessed a fine of not less than $1,200, nor more than $10,000. The director may reduce the penalty for failure to register, but in no case below $600, if the person becomes registered within 10 days of receiving a notice of infraction and the notice of infraction is for a first offense.

(4) Monetary penalties collected under this section shall be deposited in the homeowner recovery account under RCW 18.27.420.

[ 2023 c 213 s 4; 1997 c 314 s 17; 1986 c 197 s 10; 1983 1st ex.s. c 2 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 213 ss 3-9: See note following RCW 18.27.040.

Effective date—1983 1st ex.s. c 2: See note following RCW 18.27.200.